Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-601
Local governments; receive funds from United States Government; expenditures authorized.

It shall be lawful for any unit of local government of the State of Nebraska to receive funds from the United States Government pursuant to Title I of the federal State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972, Public Law 92-512, 92nd Congress, Second Session, 31 U.S.C. 1221 and following, or any successor act thereto. Such local government may use local assistance and other available resources for any purpose for which other revenue may be lawfully expended including the following:

(1) Ordinary and necessary maintenance and operating expenses for (a) public safety, including law enforcement, fire protection, and building code enforcement, (b) environmental protection, including sewage disposal, sanitation, and pollution abatement, (c) public transportation, including transit systems and streets and roads, (d) health, (e) recreation, (f) libraries, (g) social services as defined in section 68-1202, and (h) financial administration; and

(2) Ordinary and necessary capital expenditures authorized by law.

Laws 1974, LB 824, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 519, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2701.